Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.271, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. Mt. Simon-Hinckley aquifer. new text begin (a)new text end The commissioner may not issue new text begin a new text end new deleted text begin water-use permits that willdeleted text end new text begin permit tonew text end appropriate water new text begin for potable water use new text end from the Mt. Simon-Hinckley aquifer unless deleted text begin the appropriation is for potable water use,deleted text end new text begin :new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner determines thatnew text end there are no feasible or practical alternatives to this sourcedeleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2)new text end a water conservation plan new text begin that incorporates best available water conservation technology and practices new text end is incorporated deleted text begin withdeleted text end new text begin innew text end the permitnew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (3) the permit is consistent with the requirements of sections 103G.255 to 103G.299 and the general permit requirements of sections 103G.301 and 103G.111, as applicablenew text end . new text begin (b) The commissioner may not issue a new permit to appropriate water for nonpotable use from the Mt. Simon-Hinckley aquifer unless the permit satisfies the requirements of paragraph (a) and the requested appropriation is outside a metropolitan county, as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 4. new text end